.deps/sux.RL.lexd
lugal<n><gen><abs>:lugal-la
sze_ka<n><gen>:sze-ka
erin2_na<n><gen>:erin2-na
sza3_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abl>:sza3-bi
sze<n>:sze
nir_gal2<n>:nir-gal2
lugal<n>:lugal
dumu<n>:dumu
an_ub_da<n>:an-ub-da
pisan_dub_ba<n>:pisan-dub-ba
mu<n>:mu
sze_ba<n><abs>:sze-ba
lugal_a_ni_ir<n><3-sg-h-poss><dat-h>:lugal-a-ni-ir
geme2_mu<n><1-sg-poss><abs>:geme2-mu
4_barig_<n><abs>:4\(barig\)
_gesz_an_za_am<n>:\{gesz\}an-za-am
sukkal<n><gen>:sukkal
gurusz_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:gurusz-bi
ga<n><abs>:ga
ka_gir_ra<n>:ka-gir-ra
udu<n>:udu
ur5_sze3<n><term>:ur5-sze3
gu4_gesz<n>:gu4-gesz
6_bur3_<n>:6\(bur3\)
nig2_gur11<n>:nig2-gur11
gi_zi<n><gen>:gi-zi
numun<n>:numun
nig2_szuku<n>:nig2-szuku
masz2_gal<n>:masz2-gal
sa2_du11<n><gen>:sa2-du11
banda3_sze3<n><term>:banda3-sze3
ru_ba_tum_ka<n><gen><l1>:ru-ba-tum-ka
_gesz_gigir<n><term>:\{gesz\}gigir
ku6<n>:ku6
muszen_du3<n>:muszen-du3
a_sza3_ga<n><gen>:a-sza3-ga
gudu4<n>:gudu4
gi_du3<n><term>:gi-du3
nu_banda3_gu4<n><gen>:nu-banda3-gu4
kiszib3_ba<n>:kiszib3-ba
ka_SAG_guru7<n><abs>:ka\(SAG\)-guru7
ugula<n><abs>:ugula
3_bur3_<n>:3\(bur3\)
gi_musz<n>:gi-musz
ninda_ta<n><abl>:ninda-ta
e2_ba_an<n><abs>:e2-ba-an
ge6_ba_a<n>:ge6-ba-a
aga3<n>:aga3
u8<n>:u8
id_gur2<n>:id-gur2
4_iku_<n>:4\(iku\)
kir11<n><abs>:kir11
DUL3<n>:DUL3
erin2_bi<n><gen><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:erin2-bi
2_iku_<n>:2\(iku\)
lal3<n>:lal3
3_ban2_<n><abs>:3\(ban2\)
masz2_nita2<n><abs>:masz2-nita2
lu2<n><erg>:lu2
a_ra<n>:a-ra
udu_da<n><com>:udu-da
maszkim_bi_me<n><sub><3-sg-nh-poss><abs><cop-3-pl>:maszkim-bi-me
lukur<n>:lukur
ma_da_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl>:ma-da-ke4-ne
udu_gi_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl>:udu-gi-ke4-ne
apin_la2<n><gen>:apin-la2
nig2_dab5<n>:nig2-dab5
iti<n><abl>:iti
tul2<n><abs>:tul2
u4_sakar<n><gen><term>:u4-sakar
na_ru2_a<n>:na-ru2-a
munus<n>:munus
azlag2<n><dat-h>:azlag2
gesz<n>:gesz
masz<n>:masz
e2<n><term>:e2
_gi_si2_im_tum<n>:\{gi\}si2-im-tum
lugal_e<n><erg>:lugal-e
udul2<n>:udul2
tug2_ba_ke4<n><gen><erg>:tug2-ba-ke4
siki_ud5<n>:siki-ud5
inim_ma_ta<n><gen><abl>:inim-ma-ta
ka_guru7<n><erg>:ka-guru7
su3_he2<n><abs>:su3-he2
zi3<n><abs>:zi3
5_bur3_<n>:5\(bur3\)
gesz<n><gen><l1>:gesz
GAN2<n>:GAN2
udu_nita2<n><abs>:udu-nita2
gesz_i3<n>:gesz-i3
sza13_dub_ba<n>:sza13-dub-ba
ku3_babbar<n><abs>:ku3-babbar
i3_ba<n>:i3-ba
ab2<n>:ab2
gu_za<n><abs>:gu-za
ka_bur<n>:ka-bur
sag_nig2_gur11_ra_kam<n><abs><cop-3-sg>:sag-nig2-gur11-ra-kam
sar_ta<n><abl>:sar-ta
kasz4<n><dat-h>:kasz4
mar_tu<n><abs>:mar-tu
pisan<n>:pisan
szu_luh<n><abs>:szu-luh
geme2_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss>:geme2-bi
_gesz_tukul<n>:\{gesz\}tukul
dub_sar3<n>:dub-sar3
_gi_gur<n>:\{gi\}gur
ud5<n>:ud5
mar_za<n>:mar-za
_<n>:...
bahar3<n>:bahar3
_gesz_u3_suh5<n>:\{gesz\}u3-suh5
en<n>:en
sar<n><abs>:sar
ku3<n><abs>:ku3
en_nu<n><dat-h>:en-nu
tu7<n>:tu7
gesz_kesz2<n>:gesz-kesz2
_gesz_gu_za<n>:\{gesz\}gu-za
sze<n><gen>:sze
u4_te_na<n>:u4-te-na
duh<n>:duh
esir2<n>:esir2
gi<n><abs>:gi
nig2_ka9<n>:nig2-ka9
dumu_gu4_gur<n><gen>:dumu-gu4-gur
udu_ta<n><abl>:udu-ta
ma_da<n>:ma-da
kid2<n>:kid2
nig2_ar3_ra<n><abs>:nig2-ar3-ra
erin2_na_sze3<n><gen><term>:erin2-na-sze3
PA<n>:PA
sze_er_gu<n>:sze-er-gu
udu<n><abs>:udu
iti_da<n>:iti-da
a_sza3_<n>:a-<sza3>
du6_ur3<n><gen><dat-h>:du6-ur3
KA<n>:KA
gaba_ri<n>:gaba-ri
ka_us2_sa2<n><gen>:ka-us2-sa2
_gesz_mar_im<n>:\{gesz\}mar-im
sagi<n><gen>:sagi
gig<n>:gig
am<n>:am
nu_banda3<n><gen><dat-h>:nu-banda3
nin_a_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss><dat-h>:nin-a-ni
kasz<n>:kasz
_kusz_szu4_gan<n>:\{kusz\}szu4-gan
gu2_gal<n><gen>:gu2-gal
zi3_IL2<n>:zi3-IL2
kusz3<n>:kusz3
a_ri_a<n>:a-ri-a
nagar<n>:nagar
zabar_dab5<n><gen>:zabar-dab5
bala_a_sze3<n><gen><term>:bala-a-sze3
ensi2<n><gen>:ensi2
szu_ku6<n>:szu-ku6
aszgab_gal<n><gen>:aszgab-gal
_gesz_ba_an<n>:\{gesz\}ba-an
gesztu3<n>:gesztu3
szum2<n>:szum2
nig2_ba<n>:nig2-ba
sag<n>:sag
siki_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:siki-bi
a2_ag2_ga2<n>:a2-ag2-ga2
dumu_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss>:dumu-ni
_kusz_suhub2_sze3<n><term>:\{kusz\}suhub2-sze3
ni<n><abs>:ni
lugal<n><erg>:lugal
sag_nig2_gur11_ra<n>:sag-nig2-gur11-ra
engar<n>:engar
ku_du3<n>:ku-du3
inim_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:inim-bi
e2_duru5<n>:e2-duru5
_u2_kiszi17<n>:\{u2\}kiszi17
aga3_us2<n>:aga3-us2
ma_na<n><abs>:ma-na
nig2_ki<n>:nig2-ki
zi3_gu<n>:zi3-gu
sig4<n>:sig4
nagga<n>:nagga
masz2_da_re6_a<n>:masz2-da-re6-a
1_2_iku_<n>:1/2\(iku\)
_gesz_ma_nu<n><gen><abs>:\{gesz\}ma-nu
nig2_sa10_a_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss>:nig2-sa10-a-ni
a2_ge6_ba_a<n><l1>:a2-ge6-ba-a
usz_bar_e<n><erg>:usz-bar-e
a_nigin2_sze3<n><term>:a-nigin2-sze3
lugal_mu<n><1-sg-poss>:lugal-mu
al_la_ha_ru<n>:al-la-ha-ru
tu7<n><gen>:tu7
_<n><abs>:...
lugal<n><gen><dat-h>:lugal
a<n>:a
gaba_ta<n><abl>:gaba-ta
i3_gu<n>:i3-gu
sila<n>:sila
ka<n>:ka
mar_sa<n>:mar-sa
gesztin<n>:gesztin
szuku_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:szuku-bi
zabar<n>:zabar
diri<n><abs>:diri
lu2_u18_um<n>:lu2-u18-um
u4_sakar<n>:u4-sakar
ur3<n>:ur3
szandana_ta<n><gen><abl>:szandana-ta
bulug4<n><abs>:bulug4
kaskal_sze3<n><term>:kaskal-sze3
lugal<n><abs>:lugal
a_sza3<n>:a-sza3
munu4_a_sze3<n><gen><term>:munu4-a-sze3
dar_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:dar-bi
bala<n><gen>:bala
szagina<n><gen>:szagina
ensi2<n>:ensi2
gu4_e_us2_sa<n>:gu4-e-us2-sa
a_zi_ga_sze3<n><term>:a-zi-ga-sze3
ki_la2_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:ki-la2-bi
nun_ta<n><gen><abl>:nun-ta
szimaszgi2<n><abs>:szimaszgi2
gin2<n>:gin2
zi3_da<n><gen><abs>:zi3-da
_gesz_geszimmar<n>:\{gesz\}geszimmar
sag_kesz2<n>:sag-kesz2
lugal_ke4<n><gen><l3-nh>:lugal-ke4
kab2_ku5<n>:kab2-ku5
nig2_sa10<n>:nig2-sa10
sze_gin2<n>:sze-gin2
ig<n>:ig
masz2<n><abs>:masz2
na<n>:na
nam_x_ni<n><gen><abs>:nam-x-ni
sig15<n>:sig15
5_ban2_<n>:5\(ban2\)
ab<n>:ab
guru7_a<n><l1>:guru7-a
ad_kup4<n><gen>:ad-kup4
giri17_dab5<n>:giri17-dab5
szabra<n><erg>:szabra
engar<n><dat-h>:engar
2_ban2_<n><abs>:2\(ban2\)
siki<n>:siki
dam_gar3<n><gen><abs>:dam-gar3
mu_ni_im<n><3-sg-h-poss><abs><cop-3-sg>:mu-ni-im
ki<n>:ki
ensi2_ka<n><gen>:ensi2-ka
sahar<n><abs>:sahar
tug2_E2_<n>:tug2\(E2\)
_gi_gur_dub<n>:\{gi\}gur-dub
gu4_e<n><l3-nh>:gu4-e
szimaszgi<n><abs>:szimaszgi
_gesz_apin<n>:\{gesz\}apin
dabin<n><abs>:dabin
numun_na<n><gen>:numun-na
szu_igi_du<n>:szu-igi-du
mug<n>:mug
e2_gal_ta<n><abl>:e2-gal-ta
alan_da<n><com>:alan-da
zar3<n>:zar3
sahar<n><gen>:sahar
_gi_ma_an_x<n>:\{gi\}ma-an-x
lugal<n><gen><term>:lugal
im_babbar2<n>:im-babbar2
SIG7<n>:SIG7
iti<n>:iti
mar_sa_asz<n><term>:mar-sa-asz
mun<n>:mun
kikken_na<n><gen>:kikken-na
gi<n><gen>:gi
ugu2_a<n><l1>:ugu2-a
guz_za<n><gen>:guz-za
suhur<n>:suhur
ad_kup4<n><dat-h>:ad-kup4
gi_gesz<n>:gi-gesz
sila3<n><abs>:sila3
dumu_gi7<n>:dumu-gi7
udu_<n>:udu-...
1_bur3_<n>:1\(bur3\)
mur_gu4<n>:mur-gu4
nu_banda3<n>:nu-banda3
szu<n>:szu
1_ban2_<n>:1\(ban2\)
usz_bar<n><gen><abs>:usz-bar
im_du8_a<n>:im-du8-a
kasz_de2_a<n>:kasz-de2-a
diri_sze3<n><term>:diri-sze3
dub_dub_sze3<n><term>:dub-dub-sze3
_ansze_kunga2<n><gen><abs>:\{ansze\}kunga2
1_iku_<n>:1\(iku\)
ar_ha<n>:ar-ha
mu_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:mu-bi
tug2_mah<n>:tug2-mah
masz_da<n>:masz-da
gi_ra_num2<n>:gi-ra-num2
gukkal<n><abs>:gukkal
nam_sza3_tam<n>:nam-sza3-tam
sze<n>:sze
en_nun_ga2<n><abs>:en-nun-ga2
mar_sa<n><l1>:mar-sa
szuku<n>:szuku
erin2_na<n><gen>:erin2-na
i3_szah2<n><abs>:i3-szah2
gukkal_na_ke4<n><gen><3-sg-h-poss><pl><abs>:gukkal-na-ke4
bala_a<n><gen><abs>:bala-a
ku3_an<n>:ku3-an
munu4<n>:munu4
_gesz_kab2_kul<n><gen>:\{gesz\}kab2-kul
giri3_se3_ga<n>:giri3-se3-ga
siskur2<n>:siskur2
_ZI_ZI_<n>:\|ZI&ZI\|
_d_na_ru2_a<n><gen>:\{d\}na-ru2-a
_gesz_mar<n>:\{gesz\}mar
e2_gal<n><gen><l1>:e2-gal
gesz_du3<n><abs>:gesz-du3
zi3_da_ka<n><gen>:zi3-da-ka
_gesz_banszur<n>:\{gesz\}banszur
e2_usz_bar_sze3<n><term>:e2-usz-bar-sze3
na_gada<n><gen>:na-gada
kusz<n>:kusz
szesz<n>:szesz
_gesz_gag_sal<n>:\{gesz\}gag-sal
1_4_iku_<n>:1/4\(iku\)
sipa_ta<n><gen><abl>:sipa-ta
guru7<n>:guru7
nam_ti_il<n>:nam-ti-il
gu_nigin2_ba<n><l1><3-sg-nh-poss>:gu-nigin2-ba
sahar_ba<n><gen><3-sg-nh-poss>:sahar-ba
2_barig_<n>:2\(barig\)
kuruszda<n><abs>:kuruszda
nig2_mu10_us2_sa<n><abs>:nig2-mu10-us2-sa
bala<n><abs>:bala
nig2_luh<n>:nig2-luh
ur5_ra<n>:ur5-ra
bala<n><gen><l1>:bala
sanga<n><gen>:sanga
ensi2_ka<n><gen><abs>:ensi2-ka
i3<n>:i3
_kusz_suhub2<n>:\{kusz\}suhub2
masz2_<n>:masz2-...
a_sza3_ge<n><l3-nh>:a-sza3-ge
gesz_i3_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:gesz-i3-bi
nu_banda3<n><gen>:nu-banda3
sza3_bi<n><abl><3-sg-nh-poss>:sza3-bi
kas4_e_ne_sze3<n><gen><term><pl>:kas4-e-ne-sze3
szu_gid2<n><abs>:szu-gid2
gurum2<n>:gurum2
gaba_asz<n><term>:gaba-asz
1_esze3_<n>:1\(esze3\)
szum2_ma<n><gen>:szum2-ma
szum2<n><abs>:szum2
gu4_e_us2_sa<n><abs>:gu4-e-us2-sa
gu_za<n>:gu-za
diri<n>:diri
kiszib3_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:kiszib3-bi
gu2_na<n><gen>:gu2-na
aga3_us2_gal<n><dat-h>:aga3-us2-gal
ra2_gaba<n>:ra2-gaba
su_ba<n><l1><3-sg-nh-poss>:su-ba
1_szar2_<n>:1\(szar2\)
ku6_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:ku6-bi
szuku<n><abs>:szuku
ku3_sig17<n>:ku3-sig17
uruda<n>:uruda
dug<n>:dug
da_ba_tum<n>:da-ba-tum
he2_dab5<n><dat-h>:he2-dab5
nig2_dab5_ba_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl><abs>:nig2-dab5-ba-ke4-ne
sila4<n>:sila4
sze_numun<n>:sze-numun
iti_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:iti-bi
naga<n>:naga
kur_ka<n><gen>:kur-ka
szandana<n><dat-h>:szandana
_gesz_u3_szub<n>:\{gesz\}u3-szub
lu2_inim_ma_bi_me<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs><cop-3-pl>:lu2-inim-ma-bi-me
kas4<n><dat-h>:kas4
kin_gi4_a<n>:kin-gi4-a
ka_ga<n><l1>:ka-ga
haszhur<n>:haszhur
sipa_e_ne<n><pl>:sipa-e-ne
zi3<n>:zi3
bar_gal2<n>:bar-gal2
kur_ra<n><gen>:kur-ra
_gi_ba_an_du8_du8<n>:\{gi\}ba-an-du8-du8
ninda<n>:ninda
udu<n><gen><abs>:udu
bar_ta<n><abl>:bar-ta
ISZ<n>:ISZ
ta<n>:ta
e2_a<n><gen><l1>:e2-a
dam_gar3<n><gen>:dam-gar3
gi6_par4<n><gen>:gi6-par4
na_ga_ab_tum<n><l1>:na-ga-ab-tum
ku6_sze6<n>:ku6-sze6
lugal_al_bi<n><gen><dem2><abs>:lugal\{al\}-bi
nig2_ka9_ak<n><gen>:nig2-ka9-ak
szakkan2<n>:szakkan2
bappir<n>:bappir
1_barig_ta<n><abl>:1\(barig\)-ta
n_bur3_<n>:n\(bur3\)
n_iku_<n>:n\(iku\)
e2<n><gen><term>:e2
UD_g_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss><abs>:UD@g-bi
mu_kux_DU_<n>:mu-kux\(DU\)
_munus_asz2_gar3<n>:\{munus\}asz2-gar3
gesz_gi_ta<n><abl>:gesz-gi-ta
szuku_ra<n><gen>:szuku-ra
mah<n><abs>:mah
n_ban2_<n>:n\(ban2\)
bad3_gal_bi<n><dem2><abs>:bad3-gal-bi
erin2<n>:erin2
sa2<n>:sa2
aga3<n><abs>:aga3
ninda<n><abs>:ninda
sanga<n>:sanga
uzu<n>:uzu
igi<n><abs>:igi
sa<n>:sa
sanga<n><erg>:sanga
kun_zi_da<n>:kun-zi-da
gur<n><abs>:gur
sila3<n>:sila3
nu_esz3<n>:nu-esz3
igi_du8<n><gen>:igi-du8
i3<n><abs>:i3
_gesz_gag<n>:\{gesz\}gag
lunga<n><gen>:lunga
ki_la2<n><abs>:ki-la2
u4_te_na<n><abs>:u4-te-na
masz_da3_munus<n><abs>:masz-da3-munus
nig2_ezem_ma<n>:nig2-ezem-ma
udu<n><gen>:udu
ugu2_a<n><l2-nh>:ugu2-a
szabra_sze3<n><gen><term>:szabra-sze3
ensi2_ka_ta<n><gen><abl>:ensi2-ka-ta
gu4<n><abs>:gu4
_gi_ha_an_ka_ze2<n>:\{gi\}ha-an-ka-ze2
a_lum<n><abs>:a-lum
masz2_e<n><l3-nh>:masz2-e
i7<n>:i7
ARAD2<n><dat-h>:ARAD2
za<n>:za
naga<n><abs>:naga
e2_muhaldim<n><term>:e2-muhaldim
ma2<n>:ma2
ma2<n><abs>:ma2
dumu_ni_me<n><3-sg-h-poss><abs><cop-3-pl>:dumu-ni-me
sza3_ra<n>:sza3-ra
dabin<n>:dabin
gaz<n>:gaz
u4_da<n>:u4-da
sze_numun<n><abs>:sze-numun
_uruda_ha_bu3_da<n>:\{uruda\}ha-bu3-da
e2_esir<n><gen>:e2-esir
aszgab_ta<n><gen><abl>:aszgab-ta
ga<n>:ga
iszib<n>:iszib
dumu_na<n><gen><3-sg-h-poss>:dumu-na
aga3_us2_ta<n><gen><abl>:aga3-us2-ta
geme2<n>:geme2
ensi2<n><gen><l1>:ensi2
esz3_esz3<n>:esz3-esz3
ASZ_ur4<n>:ASZ-ur4
tir_sze3<n><gen><term>:tir-sze3
ad_da_na_sze3<n><gen><3-sg-h-poss><term>:ad-da-na-sze3
ku6_<n>:ku6#
4_barig_<n>:4\(barig\)
kur_ra<n><gen><abs>:kur-ra
gurusz<n><abs>:gurusz
masz_da3<n>:masz-da3
aszgab<n><gen>:aszgab
gu<n>:gu
nam_ti<n>:nam-ti
gur<n>:gur
szeg9_bar_sze3<n><gen><term>:szeg9-bar-sze3
al<n>:al
kir11<n>:kir11
gi_du3<n>:gi-du3
_gesz_dal<n>:\{gesz\}dal
bala_a<n><l1>:bala-a
e2_muhaldim_sze3<n><term>:e2-muhaldim-sze3
e2_gal_e<n><dat-nh>:e2-gal-e
3_iku_<n>:3\(iku\)
lugal<n><cop-3-sg>:lugal
dam_gar3<n><erg>:dam-gar3
ga2<n>:ga2
4_ban2_<n>:4\(ban2\)
imgaga<n>:imgaga
ra2_gaba<n><gen><l1>:ra2-gaba
ku3_dim2<n><gen>:ku3-dim2
sza3_ga<n><gen>:sza3-ga
1_bur_u_<n>:1\(bur'u\)
_kusz_e_sir2<n>:\{kusz\}e-sir2
PA<n><abs>:PA
en_na<n><gen><erg>:en-na
nig2_lam2<n>:nig2-lam2
dub_sar_<n>:dub-\(sar\)
e2_tum<n>:e2-tum
en_nun_ga2<n><gen>:en-nun-ga2
usz_bar<n><gen><dat-h>:usz-bar
a_sza3_da<n><com>:a-sza3-da
SZU<n>:SZU
lugal_ta<n><gen><abl>:lugal-ta
szu<n><l3-nh>:szu
e2_gal<n><gen>:e2-gal
ba_ba<n>:ba-ba
